test/src/gt-norm-yamls/old-yamls/V-TA-kiskiswew_gt-norm.yaml
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: [ê-kîskiswak, êkîskiswak] # SET I
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: [ê-kîskiswat, êkîskiswat]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: [ê-kîskiswâyâhk, êkîskiswâyâhk]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: [ê-kîskiswâyahk, êkîskiswâyahk]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: [ê-kîskiswâyêk, êkîskiswâyêk]
     
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: [ê-kîskiswakik, êkîskiswakik] # SET I-Pl
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: [ê-kîskiswacik, êkîskiswacik]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: [ê-kîskiswâyâhkik, êkîskiswâyâhkik]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: [ê-kîskiswâyahkok, êkîskiswâyahkok]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: [ê-kîskiswâyêkok, êkîskiswâyêkok] 
     
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: [ê-kîskisoyan, êkîskisoyan] # SET II
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [ê-kîskisoyâhk, êkîskisoyâhk]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: [ê-kîskisoyêk, êkîskisoyêk]  
       
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-kîskiswât, êkîskiswât] # SET III
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-kîskiswâcik, êkîskiswâcik]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [ê-kîskisomât, êkîskisomât]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ê-kîskisomâcik, êkîskisomâcik]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ê-kîskiswâyit, êkîskiswâyit]
     
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-kîskisomak, êkîskisomak] # SET IV
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-kîskisomat, êkîskisomat]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-kîskisomâyâhk, êkîskisomâyâhk]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-kîskisomâyahk, êkîskisomâyahk]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-kîskisomâyêk, êkîskisomâyêk]
     
     
     
     
     
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: [ê-kîskisot, êkîskisot] # SET I inv
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: [ê-kîskisosk, êkîskisosk]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: [ê-kîskisokoyâhk, êkîskisokoyâhk]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: [ê-kîskisokoyahk, êkîskisokoyahk]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: [ê-kîskisokoyêk, êkîskisokoyêk]
     
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: [ê-kîskisocik, êkîskisocik] # SET I-Pl inv
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: [ê-kîskisoskik, êkîskisoskik]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: [ê-kîskisokoyâhkik, êkîskisokoyâhkik]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: [ê-kîskisokoyahkok, êkîskisokoyahkok]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: [ê-kîskisokoyêkok, êkîskisokoyêkok]

     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: [ê-kîskisotân, êkîskisotân] # SET II inv
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: [ê-kîskisotâhk, êkîskisotâhk]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: [ê-kîskisotakok, êkîskisotakok]
     
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [ê-kîskisokot, êkîskisokot] # SET III inv
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [ê-kîskisokocik, êkîskisokocik]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-kîskisokoyit, êkîskisokoyit]
     
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: [ê-kîskisomit, êkîskisomit] # SET IV inv
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: [ê-kîskisomisk, êkîskisomisk]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: [ê-kîskisokoyâhk, êkîskisokoyâhk, ê-kîskisokowâyâhk, êkîskisokowâyâhk]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [ê-kîskisokoyêk, êkîskisokoyêk, ê-kîskisokowâyêk, êkîskisokowâyêk]
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [ê-kîskisokoyahk, êkîskisokoyahk, ê-kîskisokowâyahk, êkîskisokowâyahk]




     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3SgO: kîskiswaki # 1 and 2-3Sg
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3SgO: kîskiswaci
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO: kîskiswâyâhki
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO: [kîskiswâyahko, kîskiswâyahki]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3SgO: kîskiswâyêko

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: kîskiswâci # 3-4, 4-5
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskiswâctwâwi
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: kîskiswâyici
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3PlO: kîskiswakwâwi # 1 and 2-3Pl
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO: kîskiswatwâwi
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO: kîskiswâyâhkwâwi
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO: kîskiswâyahkwâwi
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO: kîskiswâyêkwâwi

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1SgO: kîskisoci # 1 and 2-3Sg INVERSE (3Sg-1 and 2)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2SgO: kîskisoski
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1PlO: kîskisokoyâhki
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12PlO: [kîskisokoyahko, kîskisokoyahki]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2PlO: kîskisokoyêko
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: kîskisokoci # 3-4, 4-5 INVERSE (4-3, 5-4)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: kîskisokotwâwi 
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskisokoyici
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1SgO: kîskisotwâwi # 1 and 2-3Pl INVERSE (3Pl-1 and 2)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2SgO: kîskisoskwâwi
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1PlO: kîskisokoyâhkwâwi
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+12PlO: kîskisokoyahkwâwi
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2PlO: kîskisokoyêkwâwi
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1SgO: kîskisoyani # Local sets (2-1) Okimāsis 117
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1SgO: kîskisoyêko
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: kîskisoyâhki
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2SgO: kîskisotâni # Local sets INV (1-2) Okimāsis 117
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2PlO: kîskisotako
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: kîskisotâhki
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: kîskisomaki # SET IV
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kîskisomati
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskisomâyâhki
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kîskisomâyahko, kîskisomâyahki]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskisomâyêko

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: kîskisomici # SET IV inv
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kîskisomiski
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kîskisokoyâhki, kîskisokowâyâhki]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [kîskisokoyêko, kîskisokowâyêko]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [kîskisokoyahko, kîskisokoyahki, kîskisokowâyahko, kîskisokowâyahki]
     
     
     
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: kîskis
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: kîskiswâtân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: kîskisohk 
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: kîskisok
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: kîskiswâtânik
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: kîskisohkik
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: kîskiswâhkan
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: kîskiswâkhahk
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: kîskiswâhkêk 
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: kîskiswâhkanik
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: kîskiswâkhahkok
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: kîskiswâhkêkok  
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: kîskison
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: kîskisonân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: kîskisok
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: kîskisôhkan
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: kîskisôhkâhk
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: kîskisôhkêk       
     
